North Dakota, session 69, HB1070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 50-29-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
50-29-04. Plan requirements.
The plan:
1. Must be consistent with coverage provided to children eligible for medical assistance in the
state; and
2. Must provide:
a. A modified adjusted gross income eligibility limit of two hundred tentwo hundred five
percent of the poverty line; and
b. Current eligibility may be established from the first day of the month in which the
application was received. Retroactive eligibility may be established for the three calendar
months that immediately preceded the month in which the application was received even
if there is no eligibility in the month of application. Eligibility can be established if all
factors of eligibility are met during each month.

H. B. NO. 1070 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1070.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State